North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article VI Suffrage and Eligibility to Office

§ 1. Who may vote.

Every person born in the United States and every person who has been naturalized, 18 years of age, and possessing the qualifications set out in this Article, shall be entitled to vote at any election by the people of the State, except as herein otherwise provided.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 1971, c. 201, s. 1; c. 1141, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to voter qualifications, see N.C. Const., Art. VI, § 2.

For statutory provisions as to qualifications of voters, see

G.S. 163-54

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. VI, § 1, Const. 1868, as that article was rewritten in 1900 and as amended in 1946.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Importance of Being a Woman:
A Historical Comparison of Female Political Involvement in Early Native America and the U.S.”, see 13 Elon L. Rev. 334 (2020).

For article, “Defund to Refund the Vote:
Dismantling the Criminal Justice System’s Impact on Voting,” see 13 Elon L. Rev. 193 (2020).

For article, “No More Half Measures: The Case for Compulsory Voting in United States Elections,” see 13 Elon L. Rev. 147 (2020).

For article, “From Disenfranchisement to Citizenship:
The One Person One-Vote Rule Issue and Racial Discrimination in the Trump Era,” see 13 Elon L. Rev. 77 (2020).

§ 2. Qualifications of voter.

Residence period for State elections.— Any person who has resided in the State of North Carolina for one year and in the precinct, ward, or other election district for 30 days next preceding an election, and possesses the other qualifications set out in this Article, shall be entitled to vote at any election held in this State. Removal from one precinct, ward, or other election district to another in this State shall not operate to deprive any person of the right to vote in the precinct, ward, or other election district from which that person has removed until 30 days after the removal.

Residence period for presidential elections.— The General Assembly may reduce the time of residence for persons voting in presidential elections. A person made eligible by reason of a reduction in time of residence shall possess the other qualifications set out in this Article, shall only be entitled to vote for President and Vice President of the United States or for electors for President and Vice President, and shall not thereby become eligible to hold office in this State.

Disqualification of felon.— No person adjudged guilty of a felony against this State or the United States, or adjudged guilty of a felony in another state that also would be a felony if it had been committed in this State, shall be permitted to vote unless that person shall be first restored to the rights of citizenship in the manner prescribed by law.

Photo identification for voting in person.— Voters offering to vote in person shall present photographic identification before voting. The General Assembly shall enact general laws governing the requirements of such photographic identification, which may include exceptions.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 2018-128, s. 1.

§ 3. Registration; Voting in Person.

Every person offering to vote shall be at the time legally registered as a voter as herein prescribed and in the manner provided by law. The General Assembly shall enact general laws governing the registration of voters.

Voters offering to vote in person shall present photographic identification before voting. The General Assembly shall enact general laws governing the requirements of such photographic identification, which may include exceptions.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 2018-128, s. 2.

§ 4. (See Editor’s note) Qualification for registration.

Every person presenting himself for registration shall be able to read and write any section of the Constitution in the English language.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of the first sentence of Art. VI, § 4, Const. 1868, as added in 1900 and amended in 1920.

Lassiter v. Northampton County Board of Elections, 360 U.S. 45 (1959).

The United States Supreme Court upheld N.C. Const., art. VI, s. 4 on its face under the previous iteration of the N.C. Constitution ratified in 1868. The
Lassiter
Court recognized that there is “wide scope for exercise of [the State’s] jurisdiction. Residence requirements, age, [and] previous criminal record are obvious examples indicating factors which a State may take into consideration when determining the qualifications of voters.”

Lassiter

, 360 U.S. at 51 (internal citation omitted). Ultimately, the Supreme Court held that the literacy test present in the 1868 N.C. Constitution was valid as “literacy and illiteracy are neutral on race, creed, color, and sex[.]”

Id.

at 52.

Title I of the Voting Rights Act Amendments (1970) extended the Voting Rights Act of 1965 provisions that banned “the use of literacy tests in certain States upon the finding of certain conditions by the United States Attorney General.”
Oregon v. Mitchell
, 400 U.S. 112, 131 (1970). Accordingly, literacy tests, although facially upheld in prior jurisprudence, have been prohibited by subsequent federal legislation, and are unconstitutional when conditions are met in certain States.

Defeated Amendment Proposal.

Session Laws 1969, c. 1004, s. 1, proposed to strike from this Article all of § 4, and to renumber §§ 5 through 10 as §§ 4 through 9. The amendment failed adoption at the general election held Nov. 3, 1970.

§ 5. Elections by people and General Assembly.

All elections by the people shall be by ballot, and all elections by the General Assembly shall be viva voce. A contested election for any office established by Article III of this Constitution shall be determined by joint ballot of both houses of the General Assembly in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of the first sentence of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 9, Const. 1868, and Art. VI, § 6, Const. 1868, as Art. VI was rewritten in 1900. The provisions of the second sentence of this section are similar to those of the second sentence of Art. III, § 3, Const. 1868, as amended in 1926.

§ 6. Eligibility to elective office.

Every qualified voter in North Carolina who is 21 years of age, except as in this Constitution disqualified, shall be eligible for election by the people to office.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 1971, c. 201, s. 1; c. 1141, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of the first clause of Art. VI, § 7, Const. 1868, as that article was rewritten in 1900.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Baker v. Martin and the Constitutionality of Partisan Qualifications for Appointment to District Courts,” see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1916 (1992).

§ 7. Oath.

Before entering upon the duties of an office, a person elected or appointed to the office shall take and subscribe the following oath:

“I, , do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and maintain the Constitution and laws of the United States, and the Constitution and laws of North Carolina not inconsistent therewith, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of my office as , so help me God.”

Click to view

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. VI, § 7, Const. 1868, as that article was rewritten in 1900.

§ 8. (See Editor’s note) Disqualifications for office.

The following persons shall be disqualified for office:

First, any person who shall deny the being of Almighty God.

Second, with respect to any office that is filled by election by the people, any person who is not qualified to vote in an election for that office.

Third, any person who has been adjudged guilty of treason or any other felony against this State or the United States, or any person who has been adjudged guilty of a felony in another state that also would be a felony if it had been committed in this State, or any person who has been adjudged guilty of corruption or malpractice in any office, or any person who has been removed by impeachment from any office, and who has not been restored to the rights of citizenship in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. VI, § 8, Const. 1868, as that article was rewritten in 1900.

Torasco v. Watkins, 367 U.S. 488 (1961).

The United State Supreme Court prohibited a “religious test” as a qualification for public office. The prohibition extends to the several States through the Fourteenth Amendment to protect an individual’s rights under the First Amendment. The Court held that a declaration of belief in God as a qualification of office was a violation of the “establishment of religion” by the State. “[N]either a State nor the Federal Government can constitutionally force a person ‘to profess a belief or disbelief in any religion.’ ”
Torasco
, 367 U.S. at 495 (quoting

Zorach v. Clauson

, 343 U.S. 306, 315 (1952));

see also Everson v. Board of Education

, 330 U.S. 1, 15 (1947) (holding “Neither a state nor the Federal Government can set up a church. Neither can pass laws which aid one religion, aid all religions, or prefer one religion over another.”).

Legal Periodicals.

For essay, “Something There Is That Doesn’t Love a Wall: Reflections on the History of North Carolina’s Religious Test for Public Office,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1071 (1986).

§ 9. Dual office holding.

Prohibitions.— It is salutary that the responsibilities of self-government be widely shared among the citizens of the State and that the potential abuse of authority inherent in the holding of multiple offices by an individual be avoided. Therefore, no person who holds any office or place of trust or profit under the United States or any department thereof, or under any other state or government, shall be eligible to hold any office in this State that is filled by election by the people. No person shall hold concurrently any two offices in this State that are filled by election of the people. No person shall hold concurrently any two or more appointive offices or places of trust or profit, or any combination of elective and appointive offices or places of trust or profit, except as the General Assembly shall provide by general law.

Exceptions.— The provisions of this Section shall not prohibit any officer of the military forces of the State or of the United States not on active duty for an extensive period of time, any notary public, or any delegate to a Convention of the People from holding concurrently another office or place of trust or profit under this State or the United States or any department thereof.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to action by Attorney General when a person unlawfully holds office, acts to forfeit his office, etc., see

G.S. 1-515

.

As to no person holding more than one office; exception, see

G.S. 128-1

.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. XIV, § 7, Const. 1868, as amended in 1872-1873, 1944 and 1962.

§ 10. Continuation in office.

In the absence of any contrary provision, all officers in this State, whether appointed or elected, shall hold their positions until other appointments are made or, if the offices are elective, until their successors are chosen and qualified.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. XIV, § 5, Const. 1868.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

Session Laws 2018-133, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 1, proposed a new Sec. 11 of Article VI of the North Carolina Constitution, which would have provided for a
Bipartisan State Board of Ethics and Elections Enforcement. The constitutional amendment was submitted to the voters at the general election held November 6, 2018, and was defeated.